Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3437
Certificate of licensure; issuance;
seal; use; enrollment card; issuance.

(1) The board shall
issue to any applicant who, on the basis of education, experience, and examination,
has met the requirements of the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act a
certificate of licensure giving the licensee proper authority to carry out
the prerogatives of the act. The certificate of licensure shall carry the
designation Licensed Architect or Licensed Professional (discipline) Engineer.
The certificate shall give the full name of the licensee and license number
and shall be signed by the chairperson of the board, the secretary of the
board, and a board member representing the respective profession under the
seal of the board.

(2) The certificate shall be prima facie evidence that the person is
entitled to all rights, privileges, and responsibilities of an architect or
a professional engineer while the certificate of licensure remains unrevoked
and unexpired.

(3)(a) Each licensee authorized to practice architecture or engineering
must obtain a seal. The design of the seal shall be determined by the board.
The following information shall be on the seal: State of Nebraska; licensee's
name; licensee's license number; and the words Architect or Professional (discipline)
Engineer.

(b) Whenever the
seal is applied, the licensee's signature shall be across
the seal. The board may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations for application of the seal.

(c) The seal and the date of its placement shall be on all technical submissions and calculations
whenever presented to a client or any public or governmental agency. It shall be unlawful for a licensee to
affix his or her seal or to permit his or her seal to be affixed to any document
after the expiration of the certificate or for the purpose of aiding or abetting
any other person to evade or attempt to evade the act.

(d) The seal and
date shall be placed on all originals, copies, tracings, or other reproducible
drawings and the first and last pages of specifications, reports, and studies
in such a manner that the seal, signature, and date will be reproduced and
be in compliance with rules and regulations of the board. The application
of the licensee's seal shall constitute certification that the work was done
by the licensee or under the licensee's control. In the case of multiple sealings,
the first or title page shall be sealed and dated by all involved. In addition, each sheet shall
be sealed and
dated by the licensee responsible for each sheet. In the case of an organization,
each sheet shall be sealed and dated by the licensee involved. The architect or professional
engineer in responsible charge shall seal and date the title or first
sheet.

(e) In the case of a temporary permit issued to a licensee of another
state, the licensee shall use his or her state of licensure seal and shall
affix his or her signature and temporary permit to all his or her work.

(f) Projects involving more
than one licensed architect or professional engineer shall have one designated
as the coordinating professional. The coordinating professional shall apply
his or her seal and
the date to the cover sheet of all documents and denote the seal as that of
the coordinating professional.

(4) The board shall issue to any applicant who, in the opinion of the
board, has met the requirements of the act an enrollment card as engineer-intern
which indicates that his or her name has been recorded as such in the board
office. The engineer-intern enrollment card does not authorize the holder
to practice as a professional engineer.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 37;

Laws 2013, LB7, § 2.